New Jersey, session 222, A4382.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 74 STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 2415 Agricultural Experiment Station GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2410  Institutional Support ............................................... $500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Agricultural Experiment Station ........................ $500,000 Grants-In-Aid: 82    Farm Viability Study................................ ($500,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.